Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
Penalties

424.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

424.110

to

424.370

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, any officer who fails to comply with any of the provisions of KRS 424.145(4),

424.220

,

424.230

,

424.240

,

424.250

,

424.290

, or

424.330

shall, for each such failure, be subject to a forfeiture of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), in the discretion of the court, which may be recovered only once, in a civil action brought by any citizen of the local government for which the officer serves. The costs of all proceedings, including a reasonable fee for the attorney of the citizen bringing the action, shall be assessed against the unsuccessful party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 28; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 2020 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.